da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Messingblæser – tilbehør > Remme og stativer til messingblæsere: Seler til messingblæsere; Stativer til messingblæsere
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง > สายสะพายและที่ตั้งเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง: สายคล้องเครื่องลมทองเหลือง; ขาตั้งเครื่องลมทองเหลือง
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 금관악기 부대용품 > 금관악기 스트랩/스탠드: 금관 악기 하네스; 금관 악기 스탠드
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện kèn đồng > Dây đeo & khóa nhạc cụ bằng đồng: Dây nịt đeo nhạc cụ đồng; Giá đỡ nhạc cụ đồng
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per ottoni > Tracolle e supporti per ottoni: Imbracature per ottoni; Supporti per ottoni
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων > Ιμάντες & βάσεις χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων: Ιμάντες χάλκινων πνευστών; Βάσεις χάλκινων πνευστών
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Rézfúvóshangszer-kiegészítő > Rézfúvóshangszer-pántok és -állványok: Rézfúvós hangszertartó hevederek; Rézfúvós hangszerállványok
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Brass Instrument Accessories > Brass Instrument Straps & Stands: Brass Instrument Harnesses; Brass Instrument Stands
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для медных духовых инструментов > Ремни и подставки для медных духовых инструментов: Ремни-портупеи для медных духовых инструментов; Стойки для медных духовых инструментов
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Blechblasinstrumente > Aufhängungen & Ständer für Blechinstrumente: Tragegurte für Blechblasinstrumente; Ständer für Blechblasinstrumente
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de instrumentos de sopro > Alças e suportes de instrumentos de sopro: Arneses para instrumentos de metal; Suportes para instrumentos de metal
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor koperen blaasinstrumenten > Riemen en standaarden voor koperen blaasinstrumenten: Harnassen voor koperblazers; Standaards voor koperblazers
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Vaskipuhallintarvikkeet > Vaskipuhaltimien hihnat ja telineet: Vaskipuhaltimien valjaat; Vaskipuhaltimien telineet
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za limena puhaća glazbala > Remeni i stalci za limena puhaća glazbala: Pojasevi za limena puhaća glazbala; Stalci za limena puhaća glazbala
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Üflemeli Çalgı Kayışları ve Standları: Bakır nefesli çalgı kemerleri; Bakır nefesli çalgı stantları
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 金管楽器用品 > 金管楽器用ストラップ・スタンド: 金管楽器用ハーネス; 金管楽器用スタンド
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za trobila > Oporniki in stojala za trobila: Jermeni za trobila; Stojala za trobila
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour cuivres > Sangles et supports pour cuivres: Harnais pour cuivres; Supports pour cuivres
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de metal > Bases y correas para instrumentos de metal: Arneses para instrumentos de viento metal; Soportes para instrumentos de viento metal
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за духови инструменти > Каишки и стойки за духови инструменти: Ремъци за духови медни инструменти; Стойки за духови медни инструменти
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Žesťové nástroje – příslušenství > Popruhy a stojany k žesťovým nástrojům: Popruhy na žesťové nástroje; Stojany na žesťové nástroje
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till bleckblåsinstrument > Axelband och stativ till bleckblåsinstrument: Selar för bleckblåsinstrument; Ställ för bleckblåsinstrument
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów dętych blaszanych > Paski i stojaki do instrumentów dętych blaszanych: Uprzęże do instrumentów dętych blaszanych; Statywy do instrumentów dętych blaszanych
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priedai > Varinių instrumentų diržai ir stovai: Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų diržai; Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų stovai
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 铜管乐器配件 > 铜管乐器背带与支架: 铜管乐器背带; 铜管乐器支架
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 銅管樂器配件 > 銅管樂器繫帶/腳架: 銅管樂器背帶; 銅管樂器立架
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre dychové nástroje > Popruhy a stojany na dychové nástroje: Popruhy na dychové nástroje; Stojany na dychové nástroje
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til messinginstrumenter > Stropper og stativer til messinginstrumenter: Bæreseler for messinginstrumenter; Stativer for messinginstrumenter
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de sopro de metal > Suportes e alças para instrumentos de sopro de metal: Arneses para instrumentos de metal; Suportes para instrumentos de metal
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente din alamă > Curele și stative pentru instrumente din alamă: Hamuri pentru instrumente de suflat din alamă; Suporturi pentru instrumente de suflat din alamă